Vermont statutes. Title 29 Public Property and Supplies
Chapter 19. Training Center Governance Committee

§ 841.
Committee creation.

Creation. There is created the Training Center Governance Committee to manage access to the facilities of the Robert H. Wood Jr. Criminal Justice and Fire Service Training Center of Vermont (Training Center), located in Pittsford, Vermont.

Membership. The Committee shall be composed of the following eight members:

the Executive Director of the Vermont Criminal Justice Council;

the Chair of the Vermont Fire Service Training Council;

an employee of the Department of Buildings and General Services, appointed by the Commissioner of the Department;

the Chair of the Vermont Criminal Justice Council;

the Chief Training Officer of the Vermont Fire Academy;

an employee of the Department of Corrections, appointed by the Commissioner of the Department;

the Director of the Division of Fire Safety; and

a member of the State Police, appointed by the Commissioner of Public Safety.

Powers and duties. The Committee shall:

Use and access. Govern the use of and access to the Training Center. In so governing, the Committee shall take into consideration the needs of the State’s various agencies and members of the public in using the Training Center’s facilities.

Future needs and capital investments.

Plan for the future capital needs of the Training Center;

submit a capital program plan to the Department of Buildings and General Services for the capital construction bill set forth in

32 V.S.A. § 701a

and report to the General Assembly as necessary on any recommended legislative action for capital needs; and

on an ongoing basis, monitor the effectiveness of any capital investments related to training needs.

Performance analysis. Establish policies to ensure the facility training needs of those persons that use the Training Center are cost-effectively met, and establish performance measures for assessing on an ongoing basis how well those needs are met.

Budget and rates.

Manage the operating budget for the facilities at the Training Center;

set the rates for use of space at the Training Center;

enter into and administer new contracts on behalf of the Training Center regarding the operations of the Training Center; and

develop approaches to budgeting and paying for space that encourage collaboration among those persons that use the Training Center, and address future major maintenance needs.

Meetings.

The Committee shall meet not fewer than four times per year.

A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.

The Committee shall elect a chair and may adopt rules of procedure.

Reimbursement. Members of the Committee who are not employees of the State and who are not otherwise compensated or reimbursed for their attendance shall be entitled to per diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 1010

.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 26

, § 43, eff. May 18, 2015.

§ 842.
Training Safety Subcommittee; recommendations; Governance Committee report.

Subcommittee creation. There is created as a subcommittee of the Training Center Governance Committee the Training Safety Subcommittee to make recommendations regarding training safety at the Robert H. Wood, Jr. Criminal Justice and Fire Service Training Center of Vermont (Training Center).

Subcommittee membership. The Subcommittee shall be composed of seven members.

Four of these members shall be members of the Training Center Governance Committee, appointed by the Committee as follows:

two shall represent the Vermont Police Academy; and

two shall represent the Vermont Fire Academy.

The remaining three members shall be as follows:

the Commissioner of Labor or designee;

the Risk Management Manager of the Office of Risk Management within the Agency of Administration; and

one employee of the Vermont League of Cities and Towns who specializes in risk management, appointed by the Executive Director of the League.

Subcommittee recommendations. The Subcommittee shall annually:

on or before February 1, review the safety records of the Training Center; and

on or before July 1, submit to the Training Center Governance Committee its recommendations regarding how training safety at the Training Center could be improved.

Governance Committee review and report.

The Training Center Governance Committee shall review and consider the recommendations made by the Subcommittee under subsection (c) of this section.

Annually, on or before January 15, the Governance Committee shall report to the General Assembly regarding:

any training safety issues it has discovered at the Training Center and any steps it has taken to remedy those issues; and

whether the Governance Committee has instituted any of the Subcommittee’s recommendations for training safety and if not, the reasons therefor.

The provisions of

2 V.S.A. § 20(d)

(expiration of required reports) shall not apply to the report required to be made under this subsection.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 118

(Adj. Sess.), § 12.